Utah statutes.
31A-13-103.   Registration.

The trustees of every employee welfare fund which covers any person employed in this state shall register the fund with the commissioner within three months after the fund becomes subject to this chapter.  The registration shall be in the form and shall contain the information relating to the organization, operations, and affairs of the fund as prescribed by the commissioner. 

